Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4689.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1164f. (1) The cultural history advisory board is created in the department. (2) The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint the members of the cultural history advisory board. The members of the cultural history advisory board must demonstrate cultural competency and not exhibit bias, bigotry, or discrimination against individuals protected under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804. The advisory board must consist of the following members: (a) Two members from the Asian-American and Pacific Islander communities. (b) Two members from the Latino and Hispanic communities. (c) Two members from the Black community. (d) Two members from the Middle Eastern, North African, and Chaldean communities. (e) Two members from the Indigenous community. (f) Two members from the Caribbean-American community. (g) Two members from the Jewish-American community. (h) Two members from the European-American community. (i) Two members who are K to 12 educators from the K to 3, 3 to 6, 5 to 9, and 9 to 12 grade bands and hold a valid Michigan teaching certificate. (j) One member from an organization that represents either school superintendents or local school boards. (k) Two members from the department. (l) Two members who are members of a labor organization that represents teachers. (m) Two members representing higher education. One member must represent a large state institution of higher education and one member must represent a small state institution of higher education. As used in this subdivision: (i) "Large state institution of higher education" means a state institution of higher education that has more than 15,000 enrolled students. (ii) "Small state institution of higher education" means a state institution of higher education that has less than 5,000 enrolled students. (3) The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint the members of the advisory board within 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint members of the advisory board to 2-year terms. (4) If a vacancy occurs on the advisory board, the superintendent of public instruction shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (5) The superintendent of public instruction may remove a member of the advisory board for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (6) The superintendent of public instruction shall call the first meeting of the advisory board. At the first meeting, the advisory board shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that it considers necessary or appropriate. The advisory board shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of half or more members. (7) A member of the advisory board is entitled to a per diem, as determined by the department, for service on the advisory board and the advisory board may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. (8) The advisory board shall do both of the following: (a) By not later than 2 years after all of the members of the advisory board are appointed under subsection (3), provide recommendations to the department about the K to 12 curriculum tool kit and professional development on cultural competency to support teaching history as it relates to Asian Americans, Pacific Islanders, Latin Americans, Hispanic Americans, Caribbean Americans, Indigenous People, Middle Easterners, North Africans, Chaldean Americans, Black Americans, European Americans, and Jewish Americans. (b) Hold public meetings as necessary, to gather input from the public, cultural organizations, universities, experts, and community leaders on the creation of the tool kit described in this subsection. (9) The advisory board shall collaborate with local institutions, community organizations, tribes, cultural historians, scholars, librarians, museums, and universities on the tool kit described in subsection (8) and form subcommittees to guide the development of curriculum for each cultural group described in this section. (10) As used in this section, "advisory board" means the cultural history advisory board created under subsection (1).